Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1049
Flood control funds; distribution for schools and roads; how made.

The funds paid to the State Treasurer by the United States Government under the federal Flood Control Act, 33 U.S.C. 701c-3, on account of the leasing of lands acquired by the United States for flood control purposes in the State of Nebraska, shall be distributed among the counties of the state entitled to the same for the benefit of the public schools and public roads of such counties.

Laws 1949, c. 251, § 1, p. 683;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1315;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 695.